Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.170

Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:

(1) Knowingly violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) Practicing fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in any of the private security activities covered by this chapter;

(3) Knowingly making a material misstatement or omission in the application for a firearms certificate;

(4) Not meeting the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.170.030, 18.170.040, or 18.170.060;

(5) Failing to return immediately on demand a firearm issued by an employer;

(6) Carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her duties if not the holder of a valid armed private security guard license, or carrying a firearm not meeting the provisions of this chapter while in the performance of his or her duties;

(7) Failing to return immediately on demand any uniform, badge, or other item of equipment issued to the private security guard by an employer;

(8) Making any statement that would reasonably cause another person to believe that the private security guard is a sworn peace officer;

(9) Divulging confidential information that may compromise the security of any premises, or valuables shipment, or any activity of a client to which he or she was assigned;

(10) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.170.060;

(11) Failure to maintain insurance; and

(12) Failure to have a qualifying principal in place.

[ 2002 c 86 s 248; 1997 c 58 s 837; 1995 c 277 s 12; 1991 c 334 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.